California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
(c) Transport any person or property over any additional transportation facilities, constructed or acquired pursuant to this chapter, or use or operate such additional transportation facilities.

No person, or private, public, or municipal corporation, or district or political subdivision shall do any of the acts specified in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) of this section, except in accordance with authorization or permission to do so from the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 136.)
-------------------------------------------

30105.

The commission may also grant permits to and enter into contracts with steam, electric, bus, railroad, and other transportation companies, public or private, and with any municipal or public corporation, public utility district, or political subdivision for the use of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, and for the use of the transportation facilities and the additional transportation facilities thereof, upon such terms and conditions as are mutually agreed upon if, prior to the granting of the permit or the execution of the contract, the commission first determines that the permit or contract is advisable or necessary for the financing of the bridge or other toll highway crossing or for the proper, necessary, or safe use of the bridge and for the best interests of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 137.)
-------------------------------------------

30106.

The grant of any such permit or the execution of any such contract by the California Transportation Commission shall not relieve any transportation company or corporation subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Utilities Commission from the duty of obtaining any certificate of public convenience and necessity for the conduct of a transportation service over any toll bridge or other highway crossing as required by law, or from the duty of complying with every lawful order, rule, or regulation of the Public Utilities Commission respecting such transportation service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 138.)
-------------------------------------------

30107.

In any such contract or permit, the commission may authorize the transportation company or corporation, district, or political subdivision providing transportation to use the transportation facilities and additional transportation facilities of the commission upon such terms and in such manner as the commission deems proper. Such use may be authorized without restriction to the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing to which the transportation facilities and additional transportation facilities relate, but the use authorized shall be for or in aid of the transportation of persons or property over that bridge or other highway crossing or the approaches thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 139.)
-------------------------------------------

30108.

Every contract which the commission enters into with, and every permit which it grants to, any person, or private, public, or municipal corporation, any district or political subdivision, for the transportation of persons or property by such person, or private, public, or municipal corporation, or district or political subdivision over any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, or over the additional transportation facilities of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, shall contain a provision that no privilege or contract rights acquired by such person, private, public, or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision, with regard to the transport of persons or property over any such toll bridge or with regard to additional transportation facilities, shall be an element of value in any subsequent condemnation proceeding against any such person, private, public, or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 140.)
-------------------------------------------

30109.

No privilege, permit, or contract right acquired by any such person, private, public, or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision, with regard to the transport of persons or property over any such toll bridge or other toll highway crossing or with regard to use of or passage over any additional transportation facilities shall constitute an element of value in any condemnation proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30110.

The commission, in behalf of the State, by itself or its agents or assigns, or through the department or its agents or assigns, may operate the transportation facilities of any toll bridge or other highway crossing constructed or acquired pursuant to this chapter and the additional transportation facilities authorized to be constructed or acquired pursuant to this chapter. This power may be exercised upon default of any party contracting under Section 30104 or 30105 with the commission for the transportation of persons or property for hire over any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, or upon the termination or cessation of any such contract or agreement, or in the absence of such contract or agreement.

Prior to the operation of any such transportation facilities by the commission or its agents or assigns or by the department or its agents or assigns, the commission shall first determine that the operation thereof is advisable or necessary for the financing of the bridge or other toll highway crossing, or for the proper or necessary use of the bridge or other toll highway crossing, and is for the best interests of the State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 141.)
-------------------------------------------

30111.

The commission, the officials thereof, and all state officials may do such acts and make such agreements not inconsistent with law as are necessary or desirable in connection with the duties and powers conferred upon them respectively by law regarding the construction, maintenance, operation, and insurance of toll bridges or other highway crossings, and the transportation facilities thereof or thereto, or the safeguarding of the funds and revenues required for such purposes and the payment of the indebtedness incurred therefor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 142.)
-------------------------------------------

30112.

The department and commission shall consider the inclusion of bicycle and pedestrian facilities on each new toll bridge designed and constructed pursuant to this division, including appropriate connections thereto. Such facilities shall be included on each such new bridge if the commission finds that they are economically and physically feasible. If the commission finds such facilities are not feasible, it shall report its findings to the Legislature at least one year prior to commencement of construction, including the facts on which the commission based its decision.

The cost of the bicycle and pedestrian facilities on the approaches to the toll bridge shall be paid by the commission as a part of the cost of construction of the toll bridge, unless the cost of such facilities is to be paid by a governmental agency other than a state agency. The feasibility study for such facilities shall reflect whether the commission or a governmental agency other than a state agency shall pay the cost of such facilities.

The Legislature finds that the increased use of the bicycle is a desirable activity which should be encouraged by the improvement of access available to that mode of transportation. It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to provide for the use of toll bridges by both pedestrians and bicycles, wherever this is economically and physically feasible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 143.)
-------------------------------------------

30113.

(a) The commission may utilize net revenues from toll bridges in order to finance research on high technology motion control devices to be used on the bridges.

(b) If the Metropolitan Transportation Commission allocates toll bridge net revenues as defined in Section 30884, it may utilize net revenues from the bridges under its jurisdiction to finance the research referred to in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 715, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

30114.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), no toll shall be imposed on the passage of a pedestrian, a bicycle, or a personal micromobility device, as defined in Section 1940.41 of the Civil Code, over any state-owned bridge, on which the travel of pedestrians, bicycles, or personal micromobility devices is otherwise authorized, and on which tolls are imposed on the passage of motor vehicles.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if the bridge was under construction on or after January 1, 2025,
 and if the tolls are used to fund the cost of constructing the bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 731, Sec. 2.   (AB 2669)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Powers and Duties of the Department of Transportation [30150. - 30162.]

30150.

The department shall have full charge of the acquisition and construction of all toll bridges and other toll highway crossings, transportation facilities, and additional transportation facilities authorized by the commission, the operation and maintenance thereof, and the collection of tolls thereon. The director shall proceed with the construction of the toll bridges and other highway crossings, transportation facilities, and additional transportation facilities immediately upon funds for such work being made available, and shall prosecute the work to completion as rapidly as possible.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

30150.2.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, not later than 60 days after the effective date of this section, tolls on state-owned toll bridges shall be based on the number of axles on a vehicle or the total number of axles on a vehicle plus the total number of axles on a drawn trailer or vehicle.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 252, Sec. 3.   Effective August 11, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

30150.5.

The department, at the time it submits any request, or develops and submits any program, to the California Transportation Commission for capital expenditure or improvement on any toll bridge under the jurisdiction of the California Transportation Commission and located within the region under the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, shall transmit a copy of the request or program, as the case may be, to the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, which shall review the request or program and transmit its findings and recommendations thereon to the department and the California Transportation Commission for consideration.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 579, Sec. 43.)
-------------------------------------------

30150.7.

Whenever the department offers for sale to the public coupons or commuter ticket books redeemable for the toll on any toll bridge located within the region under the jurisdiction of the Metropolitan Transportation Commission, as specified in Section 66502 of the Government Code, the department shall make the coupons or commuter ticket books available at locations convenient to the public, which shall not be limited to toll bridge facilities, and by mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 932, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

30151.

No part of any additional transportation facilities authorized, however, shall be constructed or operated by the commission, or by any person or public or private corporation, within any county or city, unless and until the route thereof within the county or city has been approved by the board of supervisors, city council, or other legislative body thereof, as the case may be, notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 147.)
-------------------------------------------

30152.

The department, through its own engineers or through such other engineers or experts as it may employ, shall design all bridges, transportation facilities, and additional transportation facilities to be built pursuant to this chapter, and may build them or any portions of them either by its own employees or by contract with any person. The cost of any or all such bridges, transportation facilities, and additional transportation facilities shall be paid from the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, or from contributions or appropriations from other sources as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30153.

All such bridges, transportation facilities, and additional transportation facilities or portion thereof shall be built by the department in accordance with The State Contract Act insofar as the provisions of that act are applicable, except that the amount of the cash, bidders’ bonds, or certified checks required to accompany any bid submitted, when bids relating to the construction of any bridge or highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities are called for, shall be fixed and determined by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30154.

The department shall require of each contractor such bonds for the faithful performance of any contract or subcontract entered into pursuant to this chapter and for the payment for any labor, materials, or supplies used in, upon, for or about the performance of the work contracted to be done, fixing such terms and conditions, and in such amounts, as it deems to be for the best interests of the State. Money realized on any such bonds shall be paid into the acquisition and construction fund of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing involved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30155.

The commission may authorize the department to acquire or construct tubes, tunnels, subways, underpasses, or overpasses either in connection with bridges or as separate highway crossings whenever the department deems such acquisition or construction advisable. All of the provisions of this chapter shall be fully applicable to the tubes, tunnels, subways, underpasses, or overpasses, the acquisition and construction of which is so authorized, and they shall be included within the word “bridge.”

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 148.)
-------------------------------------------

30156.

The department may designate and adopt as a state highway any county road or portion thereof connecting a state highway with a publicly owned bridge or publicly owned toll bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30157.

The commission and the department shall keep full, complete, and separate accounts of each toll bridge or other crossing, and annually shall prepare balance sheets and income and profit and loss statements showing the financial condition of each toll bridge or other highway crossing. The statements shall be open to the inspection of holders of bonds issued by the commission at all reasonable times.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 149.)
-------------------------------------------

30158.

The department may issue permits for the use of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing acquired or constructed pursuant to this chapter on a credit basis. Except in the case of municipal or other public corporations, governmental agencies, or common carriers having contracts directly with the commission for the operation of the transportation facilities of the bridge or crossing, and except as provided in Section 30161.5, the department shall require the holder of a permit for the use of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing on a credit basis to furnish and maintain in force a bond executed by an admitted surety insurer, approved by the department, in an amount equal to twice the department’s estimate of the toll charges to be incurred under the permit during one month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 589, Sec. 182.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

30159.

The department may revoke any permit granted for failure of the holder to comply with its terms.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 517, Sec. 382.)
-------------------------------------------

30160.

The department may also require the holder of any such permit to pay a fee of not to exceed seven dollars ($7) a month and, in addition thereto, such other fee for each individual credit transaction which, when combined with the monthly fee, will cover the estimated printing and other overhead expense, the proceeds thereof to be deposited in the fund from which such expenses are paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1172.)
-------------------------------------------

30161.

When necessary to facilitate movement of traffic, the department may limit the use of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing on a credit basis to particular classes of vehicles.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30161.5.

(a) For any bridge at which an automatic vehicle identification system, as described in this section, has been installed and is in operation, the department may waive the requirement that the holder of a credit permit furnish and maintain a surety bond. The automatic vehicle identification system shall have the capability of identifying each vehicle operating under the permit and of tabulating the number of bridge crossings by those vehicles. This section does not affect the authority of the department under Section 30796.8.

(b) The department shall notify the Legislature of the date upon which it commences operation of the system described in subdivision (a) on any bridge other
 than the bridge described in Section 30796.

(c) This section shall become inoperative five years from the date specified by the department pursuant to subdivision (b), and as of January 1 next following that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, which becomes effective on or before that January 1, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 728, Sec. 173.   (SB 71)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Inoperative on date prescribed in subd. (c).   Repealed on January 1 following inoperative date, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30162.

If the department is unable to collect any tolls due to insolvency of the obligor, or if the cost of collection of any tolls would be excessive by reason of the smallness of the amount due, the department may apply to the Controller for discharge from accountability for the collection thereof in the manner provided in Sections 13940 to 13943, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 31, Sec. 276.   (SB 836)   Effective June 27, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Custody and Use of Money [30300. - 30312.]

30300.

The proceeds from the sale of all bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter shall be paid to the State Treasurer for the credit of the commission and forthwith deposited as demand deposits in such depositary or depositaries as are authorized by law to receive deposits of state funds, to the credit of a fund to be designated as the acquisition and construction fund of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities for which the bonds were issued and sold. The fund shall, at all times, be kept segregated and set apart from all other funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 184.)
-------------------------------------------

30301.

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be paid out or disbursed solely for the acquisition or construction of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities, the acquisition of the necessary lands and easements therefor, and the payment of interest on the bonds during the period of actual construction and for a period of six months thereafter, only as the need therefor arises. The commission may agree with the purchaser of the bonds upon any conditions or limitations restricting the disbursement of such funds which are deemed advisable for the purpose of assuring the proper application of the funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 185.)
-------------------------------------------

30302.

All money in the particular acquisition and construction fund not required to meet current acquisition or construction costs of the toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities for which the bonds were issued and sold, and all funds constituting surplus revenues which are not immediately needed for the particular object or purpose to which they are required to be applied or to which they are pledged, shall be invested in bonds and obligations eligible for investment of surplus state money.

The commission may provide, in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds, that the investment of such money shall be made only in particular bonds and obligations within the classifications eligible for such investment, and such provisions shall be binding upon the commission and all officials having anything to do with the investment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 186.)
-------------------------------------------

30303.

Any surplus which exists in the particular acquisition and construction fund shall be applied to the retirement, by purchase or call, of bonds issued for the acquisition or construction of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities. If the bonds cannot be purchased at a price satisfactory to the commission and are not by their terms callable prior to maturity, the surplus shall be paid into the fund applicable to the payment of principal and interest of the bonds and shall be used for that purpose.

The proceedings authorizing the issuance of bonds may provide limitations and conditions upon the time and manner of applying the surplus to the purchase and call of outstanding bonds and the terms upon which they shall be purchased or called, and such limitations and conditions shall be followed and observed in the application and use of the surplus.

All bonds retired by purchase or call shall be immediately canceled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 187.)
-------------------------------------------

30304.

All tolls or other revenues received from the operation of any toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities acquired or constructed with the proceeds of bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be paid over by the department at least monthly to the State Treasurer who shall deposit them forthwith in such depositary or depositaries as are authorized by law to receive deposits of state funds, to the credit of a special fund to be designated as the toll revenue fund of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities producing the tolls or revenue, which fund shall at all times be kept segregated and set apart from all other funds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30305.

From the money deposited in each separate acquisition and construction fund, the State Treasurer shall transfer to the place or places of payment named in the bonds such sums as are required to pay the interest as it becomes due on all bonds sold and outstanding for the construction of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities during the period of actual construction and during the period of six months immediately thereafter. The treasurer shall thereafter transfer from each separate toll revenue fund to the place or places of payment named in the bonds such sums as are required to pay the interest on the bonds and to redeem the principal thereof as such interest payments and bond redemptions fall due for all bonds issued and sold for the construction or acquisition of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities producing the tolls or revenues deposited in the toll revenue fund. All funds transferred for the payment of principal or interest on bonds issued for any particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities shall be segregated and applied solely for the payment of such principal and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30306.

The money remaining in each separate toll revenue fund, after providing the amount required for interest and redemption of bonds, shall be held and applied as provided in the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds. If the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds do not require surplus revenues to be held or applied in any particular manner, they shall be allocated and used for other purposes incidental to the acquisition, construction, operation, and maintenance of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities as the commission determines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 681, Sec. 74.)
-------------------------------------------

30307.

Warrants for payments to be made on account of the bonds shall be duly drawn by the State Controller upon request of the State Treasurer whenever the drawing of the warrants is required in order to make such payments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30308.

Money required to meet the costs of acquisition or construction and all expenses and costs incidental to the acquisition or construction of any particular toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities, or to meet the costs of operating, maintaining, and repairing them, shall be paid from the proper fund therefor upon demand of the department and after audit thereof as provided by law upon warrants drawn by the Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30309.

All interest received or earned on money deposited in each and every fund provided for in this article shall be credited to and become a part of the particular fund upon which the interest accrues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30310.

Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the proceeds received from the sale of bonds and the tolls or other revenues received from the operation of any particular toll bridge or other highway crossings, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities may be used to defray any expenses incurred by the commission in connection with and incidental to the issuance and sale of bonds for the acquisition or construction of the particular toll bridge or other highway crossings, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities, including expenses for the preparation of surveys and estimates and the making of inspections and examinations as may be required by the purchasers of the bonds, except that the proceedings authorizing the issuance of the bonds may contain appropriate provisions governing the use and application of the bond proceeds and toll or other revenues for the purposes specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 188.)
-------------------------------------------

30311.

Insofar as any issue of bonds pursuant to this chapter for the acquisition or construction of any particular toll bridge or other highway crossing includes the acquisition or construction of any transportation facilities or additional transportation facilities to or of any such toll bridge or other highway crossing pursuant to this chapter, the provisions of this article with respect to the receipt and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of bonds, the acquisition and construction funds referred to, the receipt and disposition of tolls, the toll revenue funds, and the other provisions with respect to the receipt and disbursement of money or funds are equally applicable to the money or funds relating to such transportation facilities or additional transportation facilities as with respect to such toll bridge or other highway crossing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30312.

If the bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter for the acquisition or construction of the transportation facilities or additional transportation facilities do not include the toll bridge or other highway crossing to which such transportation facilities or additional transportation facilities relate, the provisions of this article with respect to the receipt and disposition of the proceeds from the sale of bonds, the acquisition and construction funds referred to, the receipt and disposition of tolls, the toll revenue funds, and the other provisions with respect to the receipt and disbursement of money and funds are applicable to the money or funds relating to such transportation facilities or additional transportation facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Acquisition and Disposition of Property [30400. - 30413.]

30400.

The department may acquire by gift, purchase, or eminent domain proceedings any bridge, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities, and any franchise, rights, privileges, easements, or other property either real or personal appurtenant thereto, when the acquisition or construction of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities is authorized by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 192.)
-------------------------------------------

30401.

In eminent domain proceedings to acquire property for any of the purposes of this chapter, any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing, real property, personal property, franchises, rights, easements, or other property or privileges appurtenant thereto appropriated or dedicated to a public use or purpose by any person, private, public, or municipal corporation, county, city, district, or any political subdivision of the state, may be condemned and taken, and the acquisition and use thereof as provided in this chapter for the same public use or purpose to which such property has been appropriated or dedicated or for any other public use or purpose, shall be deemed a superior and permanent right and necessity, and a more necessary use and purpose than the public use or purpose to which such property has already been appropriated or dedicated.

It shall not be necessary in any eminent domain proceedings pursuant to this section to plead or prove any acts or proceedings preliminary or prior to the adoption of the resolution required by Section 1245.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

30402.

In eminent domain proceedings to acquire property for any of the purposes of this chapter, any transportation facilities, additional transportation facilities, real property, personal property, franchises, rights, easements, or other property or privileges appurtenant thereto appropriated or dedicated to a public use or purpose by any person, private, public, or municipal corporation, county, city, district, or any political subdivision of the state may be condemned and taken and the acquisition and use thereof as provided in this chapter for the same public use or purpose to which such property has been appropriated or dedicated or for any other public use or purpose shall be deemed a superior and permanent right and necessity, and a more necessary use and purpose than the public use or purpose to which such property has already been appropriated or dedicated, except as to real estate, personal property, franchises, rights, privileges, or easements actively used by or necessary for the operation or a common carrier by railroad other than those used primarily by such railroad for the transportation of persons or property by interurban operation to and from an area within 50 miles from either end of any toll bridge or other toll highway crossing acquired or constructed pursuant to this chapter.

Except for such prior railroad use, it shall not be necessary in any eminent domain proceedings pursuant to this section to plead or prove any acts or proceedings preliminary or prior to the adoption of the resolution required by Section 1245.220 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1239.)
-------------------------------------------

30406.

When the State, or any department or governmental agency thereof, acquires any existing toll bridge or the real or personal property used in connection therewith, such property and toll bridge shall continue to be subject to taxation by the county, political subdivision, and municipal corporation in which it is located, and the State shall pay to the county granting the franchise for the bridge such amounts as become due to the county for the franchise for the construction of the toll bridge.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30407.

The right of way is given, dedicated, and set apart upon which to locate, construct, and maintain bridges or other highway crossings, transportation facilities, and additional transportation facilities which have been or may be constructed pursuant to this chapter, through, over, under, on or across any property of the State, including highways, now or hereafter owned, opened, or dedicated to or for public use and howsoever acquired, and through, over, under, on, or across the streets, alleys, lanes, and roads now or hereafter opened or dedicated to or for public use and howsoever acquired which are now or may be within any county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30408.

If any property belonging to any county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision of the state is taken for the acquisition or construction of any bridge or other toll highway crossing, or the transportation facilities or additional transportation facilities thereof or thereto, or if any such property is injured or damaged by such acquisition or construction, and the payment of compensation therefor is necessary, proper, and necessary, compensation therefor as is agreed upon may be paid by the commission to the particular county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision of the state owning or in charge of such property, or the commission may direct that eminent domain proceedings be brought pursuant to this article for the determination of such compensation, including the determination of the interest of any such county, city, public or municipal corporation, district, or political subdivision in such property and the necessity for the payment of such compensation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 193.)
-------------------------------------------

30409.

In all cases where, by statute or otherwise, any right is reserved or granted to the state or any state agency to construct or maintain highways, bridges, or approaches thereto, or other highway crossings, or railroads, or transportation facilities over, through, under, on, or across any public or private property, the commission is entitled to the benefit of such reservation or grant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 194.)
-------------------------------------------

30410.

Whenever any property acquired for any of the purposes of this chapter, whether by agreement, grant, or eminent domain, either in fee or in any lesser estate or interest, is no longer necessary for use in connection with any improvement authorized to be constructed pursuant to this chapter, or whenever a lesser interest than is owned therein is sufficient for the construction, maintenance, and operation of any improvement, or whenever it is for any other reason in the public interest to do so, the property, any part thereof, or any interest therein may be leased, sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of or dealt with by the director in the manner, upon such terms, and subject to such reservations as are first approved by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 195.)
-------------------------------------------

30411.

Whenever, either before or after the construction or reconstruction of streets, sidewalks, or other like facilities upon any property or interest in property acquired pursuant to this chapter, it appears desirable to dedicate the property to public use for such purpose, the director, with the approval of the commission, may dedicate or transfer the property to any county, city, or other public or municipal corporation within which it is located, subject, however, to any rights or interests necessary for the proper construction, maintenance, and operation of any bridge, highway crossing, or transportation facility which extends through, over, under, on, or across the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 196.)
-------------------------------------------

30412.

Any agreement, lease, or conveyance authorized by this chapter shall be executed or accepted on behalf of the State by the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------

30413.

Any money received for any such property shall be received into the funds for the bridge, other highway crossing, or transportation facilities for which the property was originally acquired.

(History: Added by Stats. 1947, Ch. 176.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Insurance of Property [30450. - 30453.]

30450.

When any toll bridge or other highway crossing, transportation facilities, or additional transportation facilities authorized pursuant to this chapter is being built by the department, the department and the commission, or either of them, may carry, or cause to be carried, such an amount of insurance or indemnity bond as protection against loss or damage as the commission deems proper.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 777, Sec. 197.)
-------------------------------------------

30451.
